apertium-is-sv.sv.dix
<!--NEW-->
<pardef n="s/ätta__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ätta</l>      <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätter</l>     <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätts</l>      <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atte</l>       <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>     <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätt</l>       <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ättande</l>   <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>     <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>att</l>     <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>atta</l>     <r>ätta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="b/ära__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ära</l>      <r>ära<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>är</l>     <r>ära<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärs</l>      <r>ära<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>       <r>ära<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urit</l>     <r>ära<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>är</l>       <r>ära<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ärande</l>   <r>ära<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uren</l>     <r>ära<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uret</l>     <r>ära<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urna</l>     <r>ära<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/inda__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>inda</l>      <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inder</l>     <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inds</l>      <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>and</l>       <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bundit</l>     <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ind</l>       <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>indande</l>   <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unden</l>     <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>undet</l>     <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>undna</l>     <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sl/ippa__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ippa</l>      <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ipper</l>     <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>app</l>       <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppit</l>     <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p>></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ipp</l>       <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippande</l>   <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppen</l>     <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppet</l>     <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppna</l>     <r>inda<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eende</l>   <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edd</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>еdda</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="l/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>og</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ett</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eende</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="bo__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="nå__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>     <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dda</l>     <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="het/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>       <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>     <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="utsätta"><i>uts</i><par n="s/ätta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bära"><i>b</i><par n="b/ära__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="binda"><i>b</i><par n="b/inda__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="be"><i>b</i><par n="b/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="le"><i>l</i><par n="l/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bero på"><i>bero</i><par n="bo__vblex"/><p><l><b/>på</l><r><g><b/>på</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="förutsätta"><i>föruts</i><par n="s/ätta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fortsätta"><i>forts</i><par n="s/ätta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="heta"><i>het</i><par n="het/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tillsätta"><i>tills</i><par n="s/ätta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="innebära"><i>inneb</i><par n="b/ära__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bry"><i>bry</i><par n="bo__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="nå"><i>nå</i><par n="nå__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="uppnå"><i>uppnå</i><par n="nå__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avsätta"><i>avs</i><par n="s/ätta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sysselsätta"><i>syssels</i><par n="s/ätta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sätta"><i>s</i><par n="s/ätta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skära"><i>sk</i><par n="b/ära__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ersätta"><i>ers</i><par n="s/ätta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ifrågasätta"><i>ifrågas</i><par n="s/ätta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slippa"><i>sl</i><par n="sl/ippa__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spå"><i>spå</i><par n="nå__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förbinda"><i>förb</i><par n="b/inda__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="omsätta"><i>oms</i><par n="s/ätta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="eftersätta"><i>efters</i><par n="s/ätta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="värdesätta"><i>värdes</i><par n="s/ätta__vblex"/></e>
